Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.12.230

Immunity of shareholders of bank insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation.

The shareholders of a banking corporation organized under the laws of this state and the deposits of which are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation shall not be liable for any debts or obligations of the bank.

[ 1986 c 279 s 50. Formerly RCW 30.12.230.]